test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-a_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Noun - kuorgâ:
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Nom: kuorˊgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuorgâ
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuorgân
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuorgâst
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Com: kuorˊgáin
    kuorgâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuoˊrgâttáá
    kuorgâ+N+Ess: kuorˊgân
    kuorgâ+N+Par: kuorˊgâd
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuorgah
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuorgâi, kuoˊrgâi]
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuorgâid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuorˊgáid
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuorgâin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Com: kuoˊrgâiguin
    kuorgâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuoˊrgâittáá
    
    Noun - vuovdâ:
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Nom: vuovˊdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Gen: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Acc: vuovdâ
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Ill: vuovdân
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Loc: vuovdâst
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Com: vuovˊdáin
    vuovdâ+N+Sg+Abe: vuoˊvdâttáá
    vuovdâ+N+Ess: vuovˊdân
    vuovdâ+N+Par: vuovˊdâd
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Nom: vuovdah
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vuovdâi, vuoˊvdâi]
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Acc: vuovdâid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Ill: vuovˊdáid
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Loc: vuovdâin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Com: vuoˊvdâiguin
    vuovdâ+N+Pl+Abe: vuoˊvdâittáá
    
    Noun - čuoškâ:
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Nom: čuošˊkâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Gen: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Acc: čuoškâ
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Ill: čuoškân
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Loc: čuoškâst
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Com: čuošˊkáin
    čuoškâ+N+Sg+Abe: čuoˊškâttáá
    čuoškâ+N+Ess: čuošˊkân
    čuoškâ+N+Par: čuošˊkâd
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Nom: čuoškah
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Gen: [čuoškâi, čuoˊškâi]
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Acc: čuoškâid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Ill: čuošˊkáid
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Loc: čuoškâin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Com: čuoˊškâiguin
    čuoškâ+N+Pl+Abe: čuoˊškâittáá
    
    Noun - lievlâ:
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Nom: lievˊlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Gen: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Acc: lievlâ
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Ill: lievlân
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Loc: lievlâst
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Com: lievˊláin
    lievlâ+N+Sg+Abe: lieˊvlâttáá
    lievlâ+N+Ess: lievˊlân
    lievlâ+N+Par: lievˊlâd
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Nom: lievlah
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Gen: [lievlâi, lieˊvlâi]
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Acc: lievlâid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Ill: lievˊláid
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Loc: lievlâin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Com: lieˊvlâiguin
    lievlâ+N+Pl+Abe: lieˊvlâittáá
    
    Noun - lahcâ:
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Nom: lahcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavcâ
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Ill: laahcân
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavcâst
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Com: lavcáin
    lahcâ+N+Sg+Abe: laˊvčâttáá
    lahcâ+N+Ess: lahcân
    lahcâ+N+Par: lahcâd
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavcah
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavcâi, laˊvcâi]
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavcâid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavcáid
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavcâin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Com: laˊvcâiguin
    lahcâ+N+Pl+Abe: laˊvcâittáá
    
    Noun - jotkâ:
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Nom: jotkâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Gen: joođhâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Acc: joođhâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Ill: jootkân
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Loc: joođhâst
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Com: jođháin
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Abe: joˊđhâttáá
    jotkâ+N+Ess: jotkân
    jotkâ+N+Par: jotkâd
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Nom: joođhah
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [joođhâi, joˊđhâi]
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Acc: joođhâid
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Ill: jođháid
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Loc: joođhâin
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Com: joˊđhâiguin
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Abe: joˊđhâittáá
    
    Noun - robdâ:
    robdâ+N+Sg+Nom: robdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Gen: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Acc: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Ill: roobdân
    robdâ+N+Sg+Loc: roobdâst
    robdâ+N+Sg+Com: robdáin
    robdâ+N+Sg+Abe: roˊbdâttáá
    robdâ+N+Ess: robdân
    robdâ+N+Par: robdâd
    robdâ+N+Pl+Nom: roobdah
    robdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [roobdâi, roˊbdâi]
    robdâ+N+Pl+Acc: roobdâid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Ill: robdáid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Loc: roobdâin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Com: roˊbdâiguin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Abe: roˊbdâittáá
    
 Noun - ruttâ:
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruttâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruuđâ
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruuṭân
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruuđâst
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Com: ruuđáin
    ruttâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruˊđâttáá
    ruttâ+N+Ess:    ruttân
    ruttâ+N+Par:    ruttâd
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruuđah
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuđâi, ruˊđâi] 
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruuđâid
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruuđáid
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruuđâin
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Com: ruˊđâiguin
    ruttâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruˊđâittáá
    
 Noun - šoŋŋâ:
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Nom: šoŋŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Gen: šooŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Acc: šooŋâ
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Ill: šooŋ̣án
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Loc: šooŋâst
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Com: šooŋáin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Sg+Abe: šoˊŋâttáá
    šoŋŋâ+N+Ess:    šoŋŋân
    šoŋŋâ+N+Par:    šoŋŋâd
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Nom: šooŋah
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Gen: [šooŋâi, šoˊŋâi] 
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Acc: šooŋâid
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Ill: šooŋáid
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Loc: šooŋâin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Com: šoˊŋâiguin
    šoŋŋâ+N+Pl+Abe: šoˊŋâittáá
    
  Noun - paarâ:
    paarâ+N+Sg+Nom: paaṛâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Gen: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Acc: paarâ
    paarâ+N+Sg+Ill: paaṛân
    paarâ+N+Sg+Loc: paarâst
    paarâ+N+Sg+Com: paaráin
    paarâ+N+Sg+Abe: paˊrâttáá
    paarâ+N+Ess:    paarrân
    paarâ+N+Par:    paarrâd
    paarâ+N+Pl+Nom: paarah
    paarâ+N+Pl+Gen: [paarâi, paˊrâi]
    paarâ+N+Pl+Acc: paarâid
    paarâ+N+Pl+Ill: paaráid
    paarâ+N+Pl+Loc: paarâin
    paarâ+N+Pl+Com: paˊrâiguin
    paarâ+N+Pl+Abe: paˊrâittáá

  Noun - kurrâ: # 2B
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurrâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurâ
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuuṛân
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurâst
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Com: kuuráin
    kurrâ+N+Sg+Abe: kuˊrâttáá
    kurrâ+N+Ess:    kurrân
    kurrâ+N+Par:   kurrâd
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurah
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuurâi, kuˊrâi]
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurâid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Ill: kuuráid
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurâin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Com: kuˊrâiguin
    kurrâ+N+Pl+Abe: kuˊrâittáá

  Noun - pakkâ:
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Nom: pakkâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Gen: paahâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Acc: paahâ
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Ill: paakân
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Loc: paahâst
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Com: pahháin
    pakkâ+N+Sg+Abe: paˊhâttáá
    pakkâ+N+Ess: pakkân
    pakkâ+N+Par: pakkâd
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Nom: paahah
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [paahâi, paˊhâi]
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Acc: paahâid
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Ill: pahháid
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Loc: paahâin
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Com: paˊhâiguin
    pakkâ+N+Pl+Abe: paˊhâittáá
    
  Noun - valssâ:
    valssâ+N+Sg+Nom: valssâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaalsâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaalsâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaalsân
    valssâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaalsâst
    valssâ+N+Sg+Com: vaalsáin
    valssâ+N+Sg+Abe: valˊsâttáá
    valssâ+N+Ess: valssân
    valssâ+N+Par: valssâd
    valssâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaalsah
    valssâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaalsâi, vaalˊsâi]
    valssâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaalsâid
    valssâ+N+Pl+Ill: vaalsáid
    valssâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaalsâin
    valssâ+N+Pl+Com: valˊsâiguin
    valssâ+N+Pl+Abe: valˊsâittáá

  Noun - loppâ:
    loppâ+N+Sg+Nom: loppâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Gen: loopâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Acc: loopâ
    loppâ+N+Sg+Ill: loopân
    loppâ+N+Sg+Loc: loopâst
    loppâ+N+Sg+Com: loppáin
    loppâ+N+Sg+Abe: loˊpâttáá
    loppâ+N+Ess: loppân
    loppâ+N+Par: loppâd
    loppâ+N+Pl+Nom: loopah
    loppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [loopâi, loˊpâi]
    loppâ+N+Pl+Acc: loopâid
    loppâ+N+Pl+Ill: loppáid
    loppâ+N+Pl+Loc: loopâin
    loppâ+N+Pl+Com: loˊpâiguin
    loppâ+N+Pl+Abe: loˊpâittáá

  Noun - pennâ:
    pennâ+N+Sg+Nom: pennâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Gen: peeṇâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Acc: peeṇâ
    pennâ+N+Sg+Ill: peenân
    pennâ+N+Sg+Loc: peeṇâst
    pennâ+N+Sg+Com: pennáin
    pennâ+N+Sg+Abe: peˊṇâttáá
    pennâ+N+Ess: pennân
    pennâ+N+Par: pennâd
    pennâ+N+Pl+Nom: penṇah
    pennâ+N+Pl+Gen: [peeṇâi, peˊṇâi]
    pennâ+N+Pl+Acc: peeṇâid
    pennâ+N+Pl+Ill: pennáid
    pennâ+N+Pl+Loc: peeṇâin
    pennâ+N+Pl+Com: peˊṇâiguin
    pennâ+N+Pl+Abe: peˊṇâittáá

  Noun - sekkâ:
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Nom: sekkâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Gen: seehâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Acc: seehâ
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Ill: seekân
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Loc: seehâst
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Com: sehháin
    sekkâ+N+Sg+Abe: seˊhâttáá
    sekkâ+N+Ess: sekkân
    sekkâ+N+Par: sekkâd
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Nom: seehah
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [seehâi, seˊhâi]
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Acc: seehâid
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Ill: sehháid
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Loc: seehâin
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Com: seˊhâiguin
    sekkâ+N+Pl+Abe: seˊhâittáá

  Noun - cuoppâ:
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Nom: cuopˊpâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Gen: cuopâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Acc: cuopâ
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Ill: cuopân
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Loc: cuopâst
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Com: cuopˊpáin
    cuoppâ+N+Sg+Abe: cuoˊpâttáá
    cuoppâ+N+Ess: cuopˊpân
    cuoppâ+N+Par: cuopˊpâd
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Nom: cuopah
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Gen: [cuopâi, cuoˊpâi]
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Acc: cuopâid
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Ill: cuopˊpáid
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Loc: cuopâin
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Com: cuoˊpâiguin
    cuoppâ+N+Pl+Abe: cuoˊpâittáá


  Noun - ruossâ:
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Nom: ruosˊsâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Gen: ruosâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Acc: ruosâ
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Ill: ruosân
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Loc: ruosâst
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Com: ruosˊsáin
    ruossâ+N+Sg+Abe: ruoˊsâttáá
    ruossâ+N+Ess: ruosˊsân
    ruossâ+N+Par: ruosˊsâd
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Nom: ruosah
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ruosâi, ruoˊsâi]
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Acc: ruosâid
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Ill: ruosˊsáid
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Loc: ruosâin
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Com: ruoˊsâiguin
    ruossâ+N+Pl+Abe: ruoˊsâittáá
    
  Noun - cuozzâ:
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Nom: cuozˊzâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Gen: cuozâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Acc: cuozâ
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Ill: cuozân
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Loc: cuozâst
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Com: cuozˊzáin
    cuozzâ+N+Sg+Abe: cuoˊzâttáá
    cuozzâ+N+Ess: cuozˊzân
    cuozzâ+N+Par: cuozˊzâd
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Nom: cuozah
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Gen: [cuozâi, cuoˊzâi]
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Acc: cuozâid
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Ill: cuozˊzáid
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Loc: cuozâin
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Com: cuoˊzâiguin
    cuozzâ+N+Pl+Abe: cuoˊzâittáá
